Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1021.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 16137 of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 16137. Room or building for juvenile offenders awaiting trial.The county commissioners of the third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth class shall provide, furnish and heat within the county a separate room or rooms or a suitable building to be used exclusively for the confinement of any and all alleged or adjudicated delinquent children or dependent children as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions) who may be in custody awaiting trial or hearing in the courts of the county, 1234567891011121314151617181920 and provide for the maintenance and care of the children while in custody.]Section 2. Title 16 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 16137.1. Rooms or buildings for juveniles.(a) Requirement.-- The county commissioners of a county shall provide, furnish and heat within the county a separate room or rooms or a suitable building to be used exclusively for the confinement, detention, reception, maintenance and care of juveniles.(b) Board of managers.--(1) A board of managers shall manage each room or building under this section. The board of managers shall consist of:(i) Three county commissioners or the county executive of the county in which the room or building is located.(ii) The county controller of the county in which the room or building is located, if the county has established the office of county controller.(iii) Six private citizens, who:(A) May not be officers or employees of the county in which the room or building is located.(B) Represent a cross section of citizens with relevant expertise in juvenile development, juvenile detention, mental health disorders and substance use disorders.(C) Shall be appointed as follows:(I) Three of the private citizens shall be appointed by the president judge of the court of common pleas in the county in which the room or 20250HB1021PN1101 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building is located.(II) Three of the private citizens shall be appointed by the chairperson of the board of county commissioners in the county in which the room or building is located.(2) A public official specified under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) may appoint a designee to attend any meeting of the board of managers. The designee shall have the right to vote at the meeting.(3) The members of a board of managers existing in the county on the effective date of this paragraph shall remain as members of the board until the expiration of the terms to which the members of the board were appointed. Annually thereafter, the members of the board and their successors shall be appointed for a term of three years.(4) Each vacancy occurring in the membership of a board of managers shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.(5) The members of a board of managers shall serve without compensation.(c) Superintendent and staff members.--(1) A board of managers may appoint a superintendent and additional staff members as may be necessary.(2) The county in which the board of managers is located shall pay the salaries of the superintendent and additional staff members.(3) The salary board of the county in which the board of managers is located shall fix th e number and compensation of the staff members of the board of managers.(d) Department of Human Services.--The Department of Human 20250HB1021PN1101 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services shall adopt or promulgate rules or regulations as necessary and appropriate regarding the composition of boards of managers.(e) Expenses and payments.--(1) The county commissioners or the county executive of a county shall make an annual appropriation to each board of managers in the county for the payment of the expenses of administering the room or building.(2) The expenses incurred in the performance of duties by a board of managers must be itemized and presented with vouchers to the county commissioners or the county executive for payment.(3) Each board of managers shall make a semiannual expense report to the county commissioners or the county executive.(4) All expenses in connection with the management and administration of a room or building by a board of managers shall be paid by the county in the manner provided by law for the payment of county obligations.(f) Reports.--(1) On or before November 1 of each year, each board of managers shall report to the county commissioners or the county executive the amount of money required for the maintenance of the room or building served by the board of managers.(2) (i) On or before November 1 of each year, each room or building under this section shall report to its board of managers information on facility operations required by the Department of Human Services.(ii) At a minimum, each report under this paragraph 20250HB1021PN1101 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 must include information on the following:(A) The use of physical restraints and seclusion at the room or building.(B) Each instance of overcrowding.(C) A description of the educational programs and access to education at the room or building.(g) Visits and reporting.--On or before November 1 of each year, each board of managers shall conduct regular announced and unannounced visits to the room or building and shall report its findings regarding the facilities to the Department of Human Services.(h) Appropriation and bond issues.-- The county commissioners or the county executive may appropriate money from public money or issue bonds in the manner provided by law for the purpose of purchasing lands or erecting, constructing and equipping a room or building for the purposes specified under this section.(i) Applicability .--This section applies to counties of the first, second, second class A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth classes and counties that have adopted a home rule charter, which have been authorized by the Department of Human Services to manage and administer rooms or buildings for the confinement, detention, reception, maintenance and care of juveniles . (j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Delinquent child." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions)."Dependent child." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302."Juvenile." An alleged or adjudicated delinquent child or 20250HB1021PN1101 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dependent child who is in custody and awaiting judicial investigation or trial or hearing in a court of the county in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 3. Subchapter E.1 of Chapter 161 of Title 16 is repealed:[SUBCHAPTER E.1SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR TEMPORARY COUNTY BUILDINGSAND FOR ROOMS IN COUNTY BUILDINGSIN COUNTIES OF THE SECOND CLASS ASec.16139.1. Scope of subchapter.16139.2. Room or building for juvenile offenders awaiting trial.16139.3. Management of houses for detention of juveniles and appointment of board and ex officio members.16139.4. Appointment and compensation of employees.16139.5. Annual report and expenses.16139.6. Appropriation and bond issues.§ 16139.1. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter shall apply to counties of the second class A.§ 16139.2. Room or building for juvenile offenders awaiting trial.The county commissioners shall provide, furnish and heat within the county a separate room or rooms or a suitable building to be used exclusively for the confinement of alleged or adjudicated delinquent children or dependent children as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions) who are in custody awaiting trial or hearing in the courts of the county, and provide for the maintenance and care of the children while in custody.20250HB1021PN1101 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 16139.3. Management of houses for detention of juveniles and appointment of board and ex officio members.(a) Board of managers.--The management of houses for the detention and reception of juveniles awaiting trial, hearing or judicial investigation under the laws of this Commonwealth shall be in a board of managers consisting of the following members:(1) Three county commissioners.(2) The county controller.(3) Six private citizens to be appointed as follows:(i) Three to be appointed by the president judge of the court of common pleas.(ii) Three to be appointed by the chairperson of the county commissioners.(b) Designees.--The county commissioners and the controller may appoint individuals to act as designees for the purpose of attending meetings of the board, and the designees shall have the right to vote at the meetings.(c) Private citizen members.--The private citizen members of the board may not be officers or employees of the county.(d) Existing boards of managers.--The members of the board of managers existing in the county shall remain as members of the board or boards of managers created in this subchapter until the expiration of the terms to which the members were appointed. Annually thereafter, the members or successors shall be appointed for a term of three years.(e) Vacancies.--Vacancies occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by the chairperson of the county commissioners or the president judge of the court of common pleas, depending upon who originally appointed the board member.20250HB1021PN1101 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Compensation.--The members of the board shall serve without compensation.§ 16139.4. Appointment and compensation of employees.The board of managers may appoint a superintendent and additional staff members as may be necessary, whose salaries shall be paid by the county. The number and compensation of the employees shall be fixed by the salary board of the county.§ 16139.5. Annual report and expenses.On or before November 1, the board of managers shall annually report to the county commissioners the amount of money required for the maintenance of the house or houses of detention. The county commissioners shall make an annual appropriation to the board of managers for the payment of the expenses of administering the house of detention. Expenses incurred in the performance of duties by the board of managers shall be itemized and presented with vouchers to the county commissioners for payment, and a semiannual expense report shall be made to the county commissioners. All expenses in connection with the management and administration of the house of detention shall be paid by the county in the manner provided by law for the payment of county obligations.§ 16139.6. Appropriation and bond issues.The county commissioners shall have power and authority for the purpose of housing juveniles to appropriate money from public money or to issue bonds in the manner provided by law for the purchase of lands or erecting, constructing and equipping a building or buildings.]Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1021PN1101 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728